Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 1. Reports of Abuse of Vulnerable Adults

§ 6901.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to protect vulnerable adults whose health and welfare may be adversely affected through abuse, neglect, or exploitation; provide a temporary or permanent nurturing and safe environment for vulnerable adults when necessary; and for these purposes to require the reporting of suspected abuse, neglect, and exploitation of vulnerable adults and the investigation of such reports and provision of services, when needed; and to intervene in the family or substitute care situation only when necessary to ensure proper care and protection of a vulnerable adult or to carry out other statutory responsibilities.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1985, No. 78

, § 1;

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. June 13, 2002.

§ 6902.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Abuse” means:

Any treatment of a vulnerable adult that places life, health, or welfare in jeopardy or is likely to result in impairment of health.

Any conduct committed with an intent or reckless disregard that such conduct is likely to cause unnecessary harm, unnecessary pain, or unnecessary suffering to a vulnerable adult.

Unnecessary or unlawful confinement or unnecessary or unlawful restraint of a vulnerable adult.

Any sexual activity with a vulnerable adult by a caregiver who volunteers for or is paid by a caregiving facility or program. This definition shall not apply to a consensual relationship between a vulnerable adult and a spouse, nor to a consensual relationship between a vulnerable adult and a caregiver hired, supervised, and directed by the vulnerable adult.

Intentionally subjecting a vulnerable adult to behavior that should reasonably be expected to result in intimidation, fear, humiliation, degradation, agitation, disorientation, or other forms of serious emotional distress.

Administration, or threatened administration, of a drug, substance, or preparation to a vulnerable adult for a purpose other than legitimate and lawful medical or therapeutic treatment.

“Caregiver” means a person, agency, facility, or other organization with responsibility for providing subsistence or medical or other care to an adult who is an elder or has a disability, who has assumed the responsibility voluntarily, by contract, or by an order of the court; or a person providing care, including medical care, custodial care, personal care, mental health services, rehabilitative services, or any other kind of care provided that is required because of another’s age or disability.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living.

“Department” means the Vermont Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living.

“Employer” means a person or organization who employs or contracts with one or more individuals to care for vulnerable adults, on either a paid or volunteer basis.

“Exploitation” means:

willfully using, withholding, transferring, or disposing of funds or property of a vulnerable adult without or in excess of legal authority for the wrongful profit or advantage of another;

acquiring possession or control of or an interest in funds or property of a vulnerable adult through the use of undue influence, harassment, duress, or fraud;

the act of forcing or compelling a vulnerable adult against his or her will to perform services for the profit or advantage of another;

any sexual activity with a vulnerable adult when the vulnerable adult does not consent or when the actor knows or should know that the vulnerable adult is incapable of resisting or declining consent to the sexual activity due to age or disability or due to fear of retribution or hardship, whether or not the actor has actual knowledge of vulnerable status.

“Neglect” means purposeful or reckless failure or omission by a caregiver to:
(7) (A) “Neglect” means purposeful or reckless failure or omission by a caregiver to:

provide care or arrange for goods or services necessary to maintain the health or safety of a vulnerable adult, including food, clothing, medicine, shelter, supervision, and medical services, unless the caregiver is acting pursuant to the wishes of the vulnerable adult or his or her representative, or an advance directive, as defined in

18 V.S.A. § 9701

;

make a reasonable effort, in accordance with the authority granted the caregiver, to protect a vulnerable adult from abuse, neglect, or exploitation by others;

carry out a plan of care for a vulnerable adult when such failure results in or could reasonably be expected to result in physical or psychological harm or a substantial risk of death to the vulnerable adult, unless the caregiver is acting pursuant to the wishes of the vulnerable adult or his or her representative, or an advance directive, as defined in

18 V.S.A. § 9701

; or

report significant changes in the health status of a vulnerable adult to a physician, nurse, or immediate supervisor, when the caregiver is employed by an organization that offers, provides or arranges for personal care.

Neglect may be repeated conduct or a single incident that has resulted in or could be expected to result in physical or psychological harm, as a result of subdivision (A)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subdivision (7).

“Plan of care” includes a duly approved plan of treatment, protocol, individual care plan, rehabilitative plan, plan to address activities of daily living, or similar procedure describing the care, treatment, or services to be provided to address a vulnerable adult’s physical, psychological, or rehabilitative needs.

“Protective services” means services, action, or intervention that will, through voluntary agreement or through appropriate court action, prevent further neglect, abuse, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult. Such services may include supervision, guidance, counseling, petitioning for appointment of a guardian, and, when necessary, assistance in the securing of safe and sanitary living accommodations. However, nothing in this chapter gives the Commissioner authority to place the vulnerable adult in a State school or hospital, except pursuant to 18 V.S.A. chapter 181 or 206.

“Representative” means a court-appointed guardian, or an agent acting under an advance directive executed pursuant to 18 V.S.A. chapter 231, unless otherwise specified in the terms of the advance directive.

“Sexual activity” means a sexual act as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 3251

, other than appropriate medical care or personal hygiene, or lewd and lascivious conduct.

“Substantiated report” means that the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee has determined after the investigation that a report is based upon accurate and reliable information that would lead a reasonable person to believe that the vulnerable adult has been abused, neglected, or exploited.

“Volunteer” means an individual who, without compensation, provides services through a private or public organization.

“Vulnerable adult” means any person 18 years of age or older who:

is a resident of a facility required to be licensed under chapter 71 of this title;

is a resident of a psychiatric hospital or a psychiatric unit of a hospital;

has been receiving personal care services for more than one month from a home health agency certified by the Vermont Department of Health or from a person or organization that offers, provides, or arranges for personal care; or

regardless of residence or whether any type of service is received, is impaired due to brain damage, infirmities of aging, mental condition, or physical, psychiatric, or developmental disability:

that results in some impairment of the individual’s ability to provide for his or her own care without assistance, including the provision of food, shelter, clothing, health care, supervision, or management of finances; or

because of the disability or infirmity, the individual has an impaired ability to protect himself or herself from abuse, neglect, or exploitation.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1983, No. 203

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1985, No. 78

, § 2;

1993, No. 100

, § 1;

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 3, 17, eff. June 13, 2002;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 130;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 215;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 84, eff. May 20, 2014;

2015, No. 23

, §§ 63, 64;

2015, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 69;

2021, No. 20

, § 344.

§ 6903.
Reporting suspected abuse, neglect, and exploitation of vulnerable adults.

Any of the following, other than a crisis worker acting pursuant to

12 V.S.A. § 1614

and the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman or a representative of the Office, as defined in section 7501 of this title, who knows of or has received information of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult or who has reason to suspect that any vulnerable adult has been abused, neglected, or exploited shall report or cause a report to be made in accordance with the provisions of section 6904 of this title within 48 hours:

all employees, contractors, and grantees of the Agency of Human Services who are involved in caregiving;

a physician, osteopath, chiropractor, physician assistant, nurse, medical examiner, licensed nursing assistant, emergency medical services personnel, dentist, or psychologist;

a school teacher, school librarian, school administrator, school guidance counselor, school aide, school bus driver, or school employee or school contractor who works regularly with students;

a mental health professional, social worker, person or organization that offers, provides, or arranges for personal care for vulnerable adults; caregiver employed by a vulnerable adult; employee of or contractor involved in caregiving for a community mental health center; law enforcement officer; or individual who works regularly with vulnerable adults and who is an employee of an adult day care center, area agency on aging, senior center, or meal program designed primarily to serve vulnerable adults;

a hospital, nursing home, residential care home, home health agency, or any entity providing nursing or nursing-related services for remuneration; intermediate care facility for adults with developmental disabilities; therapeutic community residence, group home, developmental home, school or contractor involved in caregiving; or an operator or employee of any of these facilities or agencies.

Any other concerned person not listed in subsection (a) of this section who knows of or has received a complaint of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult or who has reason to suspect that any vulnerable adult has been abused, neglected, or exploited may report or cause a report to be made in accordance with the provisions of section 6904 of this title.

The identity of a person who makes a report under this section shall be kept confidential unless:

the person making the report consents to disclosure;

a judicial proceeding results from the report; or

a court, after a hearing, finds probable cause to believe the report was not made in good faith and orders the Department to disclose the person’s identity.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1985, No. 78

, § 3;

1985, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

1985, No. 208

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. June 30, 1986;

1989, No. 76

, § 1;

1993, No. 100

, § 2;

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 4, 17, eff. June 13, 2002;

2013, No. 34

, § 30a;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 216;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 85, eff. May 20, 2014;

2017, No. 23

, § 2.

§ 6904.
Nature and content of report; to whom made.

A report shall be made orally or in writing to the Commissioner or designee as soon as possible, but in no event later than 48 hours thereafter. The report may also be made to a law enforcement officer. If an oral report is made by telephone or otherwise, the Commissioner or designee shall request that it be followed within one week by a report in writing. Reports shall contain the name and address of the reporter as well as the names and addresses of the vulnerable adult and persons responsible for his or her care, if known; the age of the
vulnerable adult; the nature of his or her disability; the nature and extent of the vulnerable adult’s abuse, neglect, or exploitation together with any evidence of previous abuse, neglect, or exploitation of the vulnerable adult; and any other information that the reporter believes might be helpful in establishing the cause of any injuries or reasons for the abuse, neglect, or exploitation as well as in protecting the vulnerable adult. If a report of abuse, neglect, or exploitation involves the acts or omissions of the Commissioner or employees of that Department, then such reports shall be directed to the Secretary of the Human Services who shall cause the report to be investigated by appropriate staff other than staff of the Department.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1985, No. 78

, § 4;

1989, No. 76

, § 2;

1993, No. 100

, § 3;

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. June 13, 2002.

§ 6905.
Mandatory reporting to and postmortem investigation of deaths by the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner.

When a person making a report of suspected abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult has reasonable cause to believe that a vulnerable adult died as a result of abuse or neglect, the Department shall notify the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner immediately.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 78

, § 5; amended

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. June 13, 2002;

2015, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 6906.
Investigation.

The Commissioner shall cause an investigation to commence within 48 hours after receipt of a report made pursuant to section 6904 of this title.
(a) (1) The Commissioner shall cause an investigation to commence within 48 hours after receipt of a report made pursuant to section 6904 of this title.

The Commissioner shall keep the reporter and the alleged victim informed during all stages of the investigation, and shall:

Notify the reporter, the victim, and the victim’s legal representative, if any, in writing if Adult Protective Services or the Division of Licensing and Protection decides not to investigate the report. The notification shall be provided within five business days after the decision is made and shall inform the reporter that he or she may ask the Commissioner to review the decision.

Notify the reporter, the victim, and the victim’s legal representative, if any, in writing if Adult Protective Services or the Division of Licensing and Protection refers the report to another agency. The notification shall be provided within five business days after the referral is made.

Notify the reporter, the victim, and the victim’s legal representative, if any, in writing of the outcome of the investigation. The notification shall be provided within five business days after the decision is made and shall inform the reporter that he or she may ask the Commissioner to review the decision.

The investigation shall include, except where inclusion would jeopardize the health, welfare, or safety of the vulnerable adult:

a visit to the reported victim’s place of residence or place of custody and to the location of the reported abuse, neglect, or exploitation;

interviews with any available witnesses to the alleged abuse, neglect, or exploitation;

an interview with the reporter of the alleged abuse, neglect, or exploitation;

an interview with the reported victim, which interview may take place without the approval of the vulnerable adult’s parents, guardian, or caregiver, but cannot take place over the objection of the reported victim; and

an opportunity for the person who allegedly abused, neglected, or exploited to be interviewed.

Upon completion of the investigation, a written report describing all evidence obtained and recommending a finding of substantiated or unsubstantiated shall be submitted to the Commissioner or designee for final resolution. If the recommendation is for a finding of substantiated the person shall be given notice of the recommendation, and the evidence that forms the basis of the recommendation, and shall be notified of how a substantiated report might be used. The person shall be offered an opportunity to dispute the recommendation and may, within 15 days of notification, request an administrative hearing in front of the Commissioner or designee. Following the hearing, or if no hearing is requested within 15 days of notification, the Commissioner or designee shall make a finding of substantiated or unsubstantiated, and notify the person of the decision and of the right to appeal.

Within 30 days of notification that a report has been substantiated, a person against whom a complaint has been lodged may apply to the Human Services Board for relief on the grounds that it is unsubstantiated. The Board shall hold a fair hearing under

3 V.S.A. § 3091

. Unless the Commissioner agrees otherwise, the fair hearing shall be given priority by the Board and an expedited hearing shall be provided, with a decision issued promptly thereafter.

If a report is found to be unsubstantiated, the records shall be retained as part of the confidential records of the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living. If no court proceeding is brought pursuant to subdivision 6903(c)(3) of this title within six years of the date of the notice to the person against whom the complaint was lodged, the records relating to the unsubstantiated report shall be destroyed after notice to such person, unless he or she requests that the records not be destroyed.

If an appeal is filed pursuant to subsection (d) of this section or to a court, the name of the individual shall not be added to the Registry until a substantiated finding of abuse, neglect, or exploitation becomes final.

If the Human Services Board or a court reverses a substantiated finding, the Commissioner shall remove all information relating to that finding in accordance with subsection (e) of this section.

When a final determination has been made, the Commissioner shall inform the vulnerable adult or his or her representative, the reporter, and, if the report is substantiated, the current employer of the individual, of the outcome of the investigation and any subsequent proceedings.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1983, No. 203

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1985, No. 78

, § 6;

1993, No. 100

, § 4;

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 5, 17, eff. June 13, 2002;

2005, No. 79

, § 6;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 131.

§ 6907.
Remedial action.

Coordinated treatment plan. If the investigation produces evidence that the vulnerable adult has been abused, neglected, or exploited, the Commissioner shall arrange for the provision of protective services in accordance with a written coordinated treatment plan.

Consent to services.

Protective services shall be provided only with the consent of the vulnerable adult, his or her guardian, or through appropriate court action. If the vulnerable adult does not consent, protective services shall not be provided, unless provision of protective services is court-ordered.

In the event that the vulnerable adult’s guardian is the person responsible for the abuse, neglect, or exploitation, and the guardian does not consent to the investigation or receipt of protective services, the Commissioner may petition for removal of the guardian.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 78

, § 7; amended

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. June 13, 2002.

§ 6908.
Immunity from liability.

Any person who in good faith makes a report under section 6904 of this title alleging abuse, neglect, or exploitation shall be immune from any liability, civil or criminal, for making the report.
Nothing in this section grants civil or criminal immunity to any person suspected of having abused, neglected, or exploited a vulnerable adult.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 78

, § 8; amended

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. June 13, 2002.

§ 6909.
Retaliatory action by employer prohibited.

No employer or supervisor may discharge; demote; transfer; reduce pay, benefits, or work privileges; prepare a negative work performance evaluation; or take any other action detrimental to any employee who files a good faith report in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, by reason of the report. Any person making a report under this chapter shall have a civil cause of action for appropriate compensatory and punitive damages against any person who causes detrimental changes in the employment status of the reporting party by reason of his or her making a report.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 78

, § 9; amended

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 86, eff. May 20, 2014.

§ 6910.
Interference by caregiver.

If consent to receive protective services has been obtained in accordance with section 6907 of this title and the Commissioner has reasonable cause to believe that the caregiver is interfering with the provision of those services, the Commissioner may petition the Superior Court for an order enjoining the caregiver from interfering with the provision of services. The petition shall present facts to show that the vulnerable adult is in need of protective services, that he or she or his or her guardian consents to the receipt of protective services, and that the caregiver has interfered with the provision of services. If the court, after hearing, finds that the vulnerable adult requires and consents to protective services, and has been prevented by his or her caregiver from receiving services, the court may issue an order enjoining the caregiver from further interference. The court may modify the terms of the coordinated treatment plan.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 78

, § 10; amended

1993, No. 100

, § 5;

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. June 13, 2002.

§ 6911.
Records of abuse, neglect, and exploitation.

Information obtained through reports and investigations, including the identity of the reporter, shall remain confidential and shall not be released absent a court order, except as follows:
(a) (1) Information obtained through reports and investigations, including the identity of the reporter, shall remain confidential and shall not be released absent a court order, except as follows:

The investigative report shall be disclosed only to:
(A) (i) The investigative report shall be disclosed only to:

the Commissioner or person designated to receive such records;

persons assigned by the Commissioner to investigate reports;

the person reported to have abused, neglected, or exploited a vulnerable adult;

the vulnerable adult or his or her representative;

the Office of Professional Regulation when deemed appropriate by the Commissioner;

the Secretary of Education when deemed appropriate by the Commissioner;

the Commissioner for Children and Families or designee for purposes of review of expungement petitions filed pursuant to section 4916c of this title;

the Commissioner of Financial Regulation when deemed appropriate by the Commissioner for an investigation related to financial exploitation;

a law enforcement agency; and

the State’s Attorney, or the Office of the Attorney General, when the Department believes there may be grounds for criminal prosecution or civil enforcement action, or in the course of a criminal or a civil investigation.

When disclosing information pursuant to this subdivision, reasonable efforts shall be made to limit the information to the minimum necessary to accomplish the intended purpose of the disclosure, and no other information, including the identity of the reporter, shall be released absent a court order.

Relevant information may be disclosed to the Secretary of Human Services, or the Secretary’s designee, for the purpose of remediating or preventing abuse, neglect, or exploitation; to assist the Agency in its monitoring and oversight responsibilities; and in the course of a relief from abuse proceeding, guardianship proceeding, or any other court proceeding when the Commissioner deems it necessary to protect the victim, and the victim or his or her representative consents to the disclosure. When disclosing information pursuant to this subdivision, reasonable efforts shall be made to limit the information to the minimum necessary to accomplish the intended purpose of the disclosure, and no other information, including the identity of the reporter, shall be released absent a court order.

Relevant information may be disclosed to a Family Division of the Superior Court, upon the request of that court, in any proceeding in which:

a parent of a child challenges a presumption of parentage under 15C V.S.A. § 402(b)(3); or

a parent of a child contests an allegation that he or she fostered or supported a bonded and dependent relationship between the child and a person seeking to be adjudicated a de facto parent under 15C V.S.A. § 501(a)(2).

Notwithstanding subdivision (1)(A) of this subsection, financial information made available to an adult protective services investigator pursuant to section 6915 of this title may be used only in a judicial or administrative proceeding or investigation directly related to a report required or authorized under this chapter. Relevant information may be disclosed to the Secretary of Human Services pursuant to subdivision (1)(B) of this subsection, and may also be disclosed to the Commissioner of Financial Regulation when the investigation relates to financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult.

The Commissioner shall maintain a registry that shall contain the following information: the names of all the individuals found on the basis of a substantiated report to have abused, neglected, or exploited a vulnerable adult; the date of the finding; and the nature of the finding. In addition, the Commissioner shall require that, aside from a person’s name, at least one other personal identifier is listed in the Registry to prevent the possibility of misidentification.

The Commissioner or designee may disclose Registry information only to:

The State’s Attorney or the Attorney General.

The public as required by the Nursing Home Reform Act of 1986 and regulations promulgated under the Act.

An employer if such information is used to determine whether to hire or retain a specific individual providing care, custody, treatment, transportation, or supervision of children or vulnerable adults. “Employer,” as used in this section, means a person or organization who employs or contracts with one or more individuals to care for or provide transportation services to children or vulnerable adults, on either a paid or volunteer basis. The employer may submit a request concerning a current employee, volunteer, grantee, or contractor or an individual to whom the employer has given a conditional offer of a contract, volunteer position, or employment. The request shall be accompanied by a release signed by the current or prospective employee, volunteer, grantee, or contractor. If that individual has a record of a substantiated report, the Commissioner shall provide the Registry information to the employer.

A person or organization serving vulnerable adults by assisting with employer functions; offering, providing, or arranging for home sharing; or providing personal care services, developmental services, or mental health services for vulnerable adults. The person or organization may submit a request concerning an individual who has applied to provide such services or an individual who is already so engaged. The request shall be in writing and shall be accompanied by a release from the person applying for or already providing such services. If the person has a record of a substantiated report, the Commissioner shall provide the Registry information.

The Commissioner for Children and Families or designee for purposes related to:

the licensing or registration of facilities and individuals regulated by the Department for Children and Families; and

the Department’s child protection obligations under chapters 49-59 of this title.

The Commissioner of Health or the Commissioner’s designee for purposes related to oversight and monitoring of persons who are served by or compensated with funds provided by the Department of Health, including persons to whom a conditional offer of employment has been made.

Upon request or when relevant to other states’ adult protective services offices.

The Board of Medical Practice for the purpose of evaluating an applicant, licensee, or holder of certification pursuant to

26 V.S.A. § 1353

.

The Secretary of Education or the Secretary’s designee, for purposes related to the licensing of professional educators pursuant to 16 V.S.A. chapter 5, subchapter 4 and chapter 51.

The Office of Professional Regulation for the purpose of evaluating an applicant, licensee, holder of a certification, or registrant for possible unprofessional conduct.

A Family Division of the Superior Court upon request of that court if it is involved in any proceeding in which:

a parent of a child challenges a presumption of parentage under 15C V.S.A. § 402(b)(3); or

a parent of a child contests an allegation that he or she fostered or supported a bonded and dependent relationship between the child and a person seeking to be adjudicated a de facto parent under 15C V.S.A. § 501(a)(2).

An employer providing transportation services to children or vulnerable adults may disclose Registry records obtained pursuant to subdivision (c)(3) of this section to the Agency of Human Services or its designee for the sole purpose of auditing the records to ensure compliance with this chapter. An employer shall provide such records at the request of the Agency or its designee. Only Registry records regarding individuals who provide direct transportation services or otherwise have direct contact with children or vulnerable adults may be disclosed.

A person may, at any time, apply to the Human Services Board for relief if he or she has reasonable cause to believe that the contents of the Registry or investigative records are being misused.

A person may at any time apply to the Department for expungement of his or her name from the Registry. The petitioner shall have the burden of showing why his or her name should be expunged from the Registry.

Any person who violates this section shall be fined not more than $500.00.

Volunteers shall be considered employees for purposes of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1985, No. 78

, § 11;

1989, No. 76

, § 3;

1993, No. 100

, § 6;

1995, No. 51

, § 1;

1995, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. May 1, 1996;

1995, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. May 15, 1996;

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. June 13, 2002;

2003, No. 66

, § 136c;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 132;

2007, No. 77

, § 2, eff. June 7, 2007;

2011, No. 61

, § 8, June 2, 2011;

2011, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2013, No. 56

, §§ 7a, 7b;

2015, No. 38

, § 43, eff. May 28, 2015;

2015, No. 60

, § 13;

2015, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 10, 2016;

2017, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2021, No. 20

, § 345.

§ 6912.
Public education and disclosure of rights and duties; posting of notice.

The Department, within available appropriations, shall conduct a publicity and education program to encourage the fullest degree of reporting of suspected abuse, neglect, or exploitation of vulnerable adults.

All agencies, facilities, or institutions providing care and services to adults who are elders, have a disability, or are vulnerable shall inform their employees of their right and duty to report suspected incidents of abuse, neglect, or exploitation and the protections afforded them by this chapter, and shall establish appropriate policies and procedures to facilitate such reporting.

All agencies, facilities, or institutions providing care and services to vulnerable adults shall post in a prominent and accessible location a poster describing the protections afforded to vulnerable adults by this chapter and by 13 V.S.A. chapter 28. The poster shall include, at a minimum, the following:
(c) (1) All agencies, facilities, or institutions providing care and services to vulnerable adults shall post in a prominent and accessible location a poster describing the protections afforded to vulnerable adults by this chapter and by 13 V.S.A. chapter 28. The poster shall include, at a minimum, the following:

a statement that abuse, neglect, and exploitation of vulnerable adults is unlawful;

a statement that it is unlawful to retaliate against a person for filing a complaint of abuse, neglect, or exploitation or for cooperating in an investigation of abuse, neglect, or exploitation;

a description and examples of abuse, neglect, and exploitation;

a statement of the range of consequences for persons who commit abuse, neglect, or exploitation;

if the agency, facility, or institution has more than five employees, a description of the process for filing internal complaints about abuse, neglect, and exploitation, and the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the person or persons to whom complaints should be made; and

the complaint process of the appropriate State and federal agencies and directions as to how to contact such agencies.

Except as provided in subdivision (3) of this subsection, the poster required by this subsection shall be posted in a location where it would ordinarily be viewed by vulnerable adults.

An agency, facility, or institution that provides home-based services shall:

display the poster required by this subsection in its principal place of business; and

provide a written notice that includes all information contained on the poster to each vulnerable adult for whom services are provided.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 78

, § 12; amended

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. June 13, 2002;

2005, No. 79

, § 7;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 217;

2021, No. 20

, § 346.

§ 6913.
Penalties; abuse; neglect; exploitation; mandatory reporter’s failure to report.

Whenever the Commissioner finds, after notice and hearing, that a person has committed sexual abuse as defined in subdivision 6902(1)(D) of this title, sexual exploitation as defined in subdivision 6902(6)(D), exploitation as defined in subdivision 6902(6)(A) or (B) in an amount in excess of $500.00, abuse that causes grievous injury to or the death of a vulnerable adult, or neglect that causes grievous injury to or the death of a vulnerable adult, the Commissioner may impose an administrative penalty of not more than $10,000.00 for each violation. The Commissioner shall notify the Office of Professional Regulation, or any other professional licensing board applicable to the violator, of any decision made pursuant to this subsection.

Whenever the Commissioner finds, after notice and hearing, that a mandatory reporter, as defined in subdivisions 6903(a)(1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) of this title, has willfully violated the provisions of subsection 6903(a), the Commissioner may impose an administrative penalty not to exceed $500.00 per violation. For purposes of this subsection, every 24 hours that a report is not made beyond the period for reporting required by subsection 6903(a) shall constitute a new and separate violation, and a mandatory reporter shall be liable for an administrative penalty of not more than $500.00 for each 24-hour period, not to exceed a maximum penalty of $5,000.00 per reportable incident.

A person who is aggrieved by a decision under subsection (a) or (b) of this section may appeal that decision to the Superior Court where either party may request trial by jury.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 78

, § 13; amended

1993, No. 100

, § 8;

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. June 13, 2002;

2005, No. 79

, § 4.

§ 6914.
Access to criminal records.

The Commissioner may obtain from the Vermont Crime Information Center the record of convictions of any person to the extent that the Commissioner has determined by rule that such information is necessary to protect vulnerable adults.

An employer may ask the Commissioner to obtain from the Vermont Crime Information Center the record of convictions of a person who is a current employee, volunteer, or contractor, or a person to whom the employer has given a conditional offer of a contract, volunteer position, or employment. The request shall be in writing and shall be accompanied by a release by the current or prospective contractor or employee. If the person has a record of convictions, the Commissioner shall inform the employer of the date and type of conviction.

A person or organization serving vulnerable adults by assisting with employer functions, offering, providing, or arranging for home sharing, personal care services, developmental services, or mental health services for vulnerable adults, may submit a request to the Commissioner concerning an individual who has applied to provide such services or an individual who is already so engaged. The request shall be in writing, and shall be accompanied by a release from the individual applying for or already providing such services. If the individual has a record of convictions, the Commissioner shall inform the person or organization submitting the request of the date and type of conviction.

The Commissioners of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living, of Health, and of Mental Health or their designees may, for purposes related to oversight and monitoring of persons who are served by or compensated with funds provided by the Departments of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living, of Health, and of Mental Health, ask the Vermont Crime Information Center for the record of convictions of a person who is a current employee, volunteer, or contractor, or a person to whom the employer has given a conditional offer of a contract, volunteer position, or employment. If the individual has a record of convictions, the Vermont Crime Information Center shall inform the appropriate Commissioner, or the Commissioner’s designee, of the date and type of conviction.

Information released to an employer under this section shall not be released or disclosed by the employer to any person. Any person who violates this subsection shall be fined not more than $500.00.

Volunteers shall be considered employees for purposes of this section.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 100

, § 9; amended

1995, No. 51

, § 2;

1995, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. June 13, 2002;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 133;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 87, eff. May 20, 2014.